District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

22-3312.03b

Collection against owner.

Repealed.

Mar. 10, 1983, D.C. Law 4-203, § 4b
as added June 12, 2001, D.C. Law 13-309, § 2(c), 48 DCR 1613
Sept. 18, 2010, D.C. Law 18-219, § 13(b)(2), 57 DCR 4353

History

For temporary (90 day) repeal of section, see § 13(b)(2) of Anti-Graffiti Emergency Act of 2010 (D.C. Act 18-389, May 5, 2010, 57 DCR 4332).

Emergency Legislation